Utah statutes.
39-6-92.   Improper hazarding of vessel.

(1)  A person subject to this chapter who willfully and unlawfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States or of the National Guard shall be punished as a military court directs.

(2)  A person subject to this chapter who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States or of the National Guard shall be punished as a military court directs.

